Washington statutes.
RCW 36.54.050

Joint ferries over water boundary between two counties—Commission authority—Expenses shared.

The joint commission is authorized to transact all business necessary in carrying out the purposes of RCW 36.54.030 through 36.54.070 and its acts shall be binding upon the two counties, and one-half of all bills and obligations created by the commission shall be binding and a legal charge against the road fund of each county and the claims therefor shall be allowed and paid out of the county road fund the same as other claims against said fund are allowed and paid, unless otherwise provided in an agreement between the two counties.

[ 2006 c 332 s 10; 1963 c 4 s 36.54.050. Prior: 1917 c 158 s 3; RRS s 5481.]